Utah statutes.
4-39-202.   General facility requirements.
(1) (a)  Internal handling facilities shall be capable of humanely restraining
an individual animal and to facilitate:
(i)  the application or reading of any animal identification;
(ii)  the taking of blood or tissue samples; and
(iii)  any other required or necessary testing procedure.
(b)  A domesticated elk facility shall be properly constructed to protect
inspection personnel while they are handling the domesticated elk.
(2)  The domesticated elk facility owner shall provide ample signage around
the facility indicating that it is a domesticated elk facility, so that the
public is put on notice that the animals are not wild elk.
